el: Συμβατότητα σόλας μπότας: 75 mm 3 ακίδων; 75 mm Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP Plate; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Cable; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Άλλο
nl: Compatibiliteit schoenzool: 75 mm 3-pins; 75 mm Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-plaat; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/pin; Telemark 75 mm-kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Overige
vi: Khả năng tương thích đế giày: 75 mm 3 ngàm; 75 mm Telemark; Trượt tuyết Alpine (ISO 5355); Trượt tuyết Alpine (AT); Trượt tuyết Alpine (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Tấm khóa IFP; Trẻ em (ISO 5355 C); GripWalk trẻ em (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Trục/Ngàm (Tech/Pin); Cáp Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Khác
da: Kompatibilitet med støvlesåler: 75 mm 3-pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpint (ISO 5355); Alpin touring (AT); Alpin touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-plade; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/pin; Telemark 75 mm-kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Andet
tr: Bot tabanı uyumluluğu: 75 mm 3 pinli; 75 mm Telemark; Alp (ISO 5355); Alp turu (AT); Alp turu (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP plaka; Genç (ISO 5355 C); Genç GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Teknoloji/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kablolu; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilita podrážky topánok: 75 mm (3-pin); 75 mm (telemark); Alpínske (ISO 5355); Skialpinistické (AT); Skialpinistické (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP Plate; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark (75 mm, s káblom); Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Iné
hu: Bakancstalp-kompatibilitás: 75 mm-es 3-tűs; 75 mm-es Telemark; Alpesi (ISO 5355); Túrasí (AT); Túrasí (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP platni; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kábeles; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Egyéb
es: Compatibilidad de suelas de botas: 3 pines de 75 mm; Telemark de 75 mm; Alpino (ISO 5355); Touring alpino (AT); Touring alpino (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Placa IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); GripWalk junior (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Cable Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Otro
sv: Kompatibel med stövelsula: 75 mm 3-pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpin (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-platta; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Annan
sl-SI: Združljivost podplata škornja: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpsko (ISO 5355); Turno smučanje (AT); Turno smučanje (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Plošča IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm (kabel); Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Drugo
en: Boot sole compatibility: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP Plate; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Cable; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Other
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของพื้นรองเท้าบูท: 75 มม. แบบ 3 พิน; 75 มม. Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); แผ่น IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; สายเคเบิล Telemark 75 มม.; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost potplata čizme: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP pločica; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Ostalo
fi: Monon pohjan yhteensopivuus: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alppi (ISO 5355); Alppihiihtovaellus (AT); Alppihiihtovaellus (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-levy; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kaapeli; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Muu
lt-LT: Batų pado suderinamumas: 75 mm „3-Pin“; 75 mm „Telemark“; Alpinių (ISO 5355); Alpinių turistinių (AT); Alpinių turistinių (ISO 9523); „GripWalk“ (ISO 23223); IFP plokštė; Jaunių (ISO 5355 C); Jaunių „GripWalk“ (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; „Prolink“; SNS; „Tech / Pin“; „Telemark“ 75 mm trosas; „Telemark“ NTN; „Turnamic“; „Walk To Ride“ (WTR); „Xplore“; Kitas
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea tălpii cizmei: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpin (ISO 5355); Schi de tură (AT); Schi de tură (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Placă IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Cablu Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Altele
fr: Compatibilité des semelles de bottes: 75 mm à 3 broches; Télémark 75 mm; Alpin (ISO 5355); Ski de randonnée (AT); Ski de randonnée (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Plaque IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Insert/à broches; Câble de télémark 75 mm; Télémark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Autre
de: Schuhsohlenkompatibilität: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpin (ISO 5355); Alpin-Touren (AT); Alpin-Touren (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-Platte; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilita podrážky boty: 75mm 3pin; 75mm Telemark; Sjezdové (ISO 5355); Skialpové (AT); Skialpové (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Deska IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemarkové 75mm lankové; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Jiné
pt-PT: Compatibilidade da sola da bota: 75 mm 3 pinos; 75 mm Telemark; Alpina (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Placa IFP; Júnior (ISO 5355 C); Júnior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pino; Cabo Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Outro
pt-BR: Compatibilidade da sola da bota: 3 pinos 75 mm; Telemark 75 mm; Alpino (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Placa IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Cabo Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Outros
nb: Kompatibilitet for støvelsåle: 75 mm 3-pinners; 75 mm telemark; Alpint (ISO 5355); Randonee (AT); Randonee (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP-plate; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Annet
zh-TW: 靴底相容性: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; 高山滑雪 (ISO 5355); 登山滑雪 (AT); 登山滑雪 (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP 底板; 兒童 (ISO 5355 C); 兒童 GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Cable; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; 其他
pl: Zgodność z podeszwami butów: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpejskie (ISO 5355); Skitourowe (AT); Skitourowe (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Płyta IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech / Pin; Telemark 75 mm Cable; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместимост на подметката на обувките: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Алпийски (ISO 5355); Алпийски туринг (AT); Алпийски туринг (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Пластина IFP; Младежки (ISO 5355 C); Младежки GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm с кабел; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Друго
ja: ブーツソール適合性: 75 mm 3ピン; 75 mm テレマーク; アルペン（ISO 5355）; アルペンツーリング（AT）; アルペンツーリング（ISO 9523）; GripWalk（ISO 23223）; IFPプレート; ジュニア（ISO 5355 C）; ジュニア GripWalk（ISO 23223 C）; NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; テレマーク 75 mm ケーブル; テレマーク NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride（WTR）; Xplore; その他
ko: 부츠 아웃솔 호환성: 75mm 3핀; 75mm 텔레마크; 알파인(ISO 5355); 알파인 투어링(AT); 알파인 투어링(ISO 9523); 그립워크(ISO 23223); IFP 플레이트; 주니어(ISO 5355 C); 주니어 그립워크(ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; 프로링크; SNS; 테크/핀; 텔레마크 75mm 케이블; 텔레마크 NTN; 턴어믹; 워크 투 라이드(WTR); 익스플로어; 기타
it: Compatibilità della suola dello stivale: 75 mm 3-Pin; 75 mm Telemark; Alpino (ISO 5355); Scialpinismo (AT); Scialpinismo (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Piastra IFP; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark cavo 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Altro
zh-CN: 靴底兼容性: 75 mm 3 针; 75 mm 泰勒马克; 高山滑雪 (ISO 5355); 高山巡游 (AT); 高山巡游 (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP 底板; 青少年款 (ISO 5355 C); 青少年款 GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; 泰勒马克 75 mm 缆绳; 泰勒马克 NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; 其他
ru: Совместимость подошвы ботинок: 75 мм (3-pin); 75 мм Telemark; Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine Touring (AT); Alpine Touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); IFP Plate; Junior (ISO 5355 C); Junior GripWalk (ISO 23223 C); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; SNS; Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 мм Cable; Telemark NTN; Turnamic; Walk To Ride (WTR); Xplore; Другое